src/morphology/inflection/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!! ---------------
!! The Klingon language verbs inflect in persons with obligatory prefixes, then
!! ...

LEXICON VerbalPrefixes
Sg1+:jI     Verbs ;
Sg2+:bI     Verbs ;
Sg3+:0     Verbs ;
Pl1+:ma     Verbs ;
Pl2+:Su     Verbs ;
Pl3+:0     Verbs ;
Sg2/Sg1+:cho     Verbs ;
Sg3/Sg1+:mu     Verbs ;
Pl2/Sg1+:tu     Verbs ;
Pl3/Sg1+:mu     Verbs ;
Sg1/Sg2+:qa     Verbs ;
Sg3/Sg2+:Du     Verbs ;
Pl1/Sg2+:pI     Verbs ;
Pl3/Sg2+:nI     Verbs ;
Sg1/Sg3+:vI     Verbs ;
Sg2/Sg3+:Da     Verbs ;
Sg3/Sg3+:0     Verbs ;
Pl1/Sg3+:wI     Verbs ;
Pl2/Sg3+:bo     Verbs ;
Pl3/Sg3+:lu     Verbs ;
Sg2/Pl1+:ju     Verbs ;
Sg3/Pl1+:nu     Verbs ;
Pl2/Pl1+:che     Verbs ;
Pl3/Pl1+:nu     Verbs ;
Sg1/Pl2+:Sa     Verbs ;
Sg3/Pl2+:lI     Verbs ;
Pl1/Pl2+:re     Verbs ;
Pl1/Pl2+:lI     Verbs ;
Sg1/Pl3+:vI     Verbs ;
Sg2/Pl3+:Da     Verbs ;
Sg3/Pl3+:0     Verbs ;
Pl1/Pl3+:DI     Verbs ;
Pl2/Pl3+:bo     Verbs ;
Pl3/Pl3+:0     Verbs ;
Imprt+Sg2+:yI     Verbs ;
Imprt+Pl2+:pe     Verbs ;
Imprt+Sg2/Sg1+:HI     Verbs ;
Imprt+Pl2/Sg1+:HI     Verbs ;
Imprt+Sg2/Sg3+:yI     Verbs ;
Imprt+Pl2/Sg3+:yI     Verbs ;
Imprt+Pl2/Pl1+:gho     Verbs ;
Imprt+Pl2/Pl1+:gho     Verbs ;
Imprt+Pl2/Pl3+:tI     Verbs ;
Imprt+Pl2/Pl3+:tI     Verbs ;

LEXICON Reflexive
+Refl:’egh   Volition?   ;
+Reciproc:chuq  Volition?   ;

LEXICON Volition
+Foc/nIs:nIS    Change? ;
+Foc/qang:qang  Change? ;
+Foc/rup:rup    Change? ;
+Foc/beH:beH    Change? ;
+Foc/vIp:vIp    Change? ;

LEXICON Change
+Foc/choh:choh  Cause?  ;
+Foc:qa’    Cause?  ;

LEXICON Cause
+Caus:moH   Definite?   ;

LEXICON Definite
+Foc/lu’:lu’    Qualification?  ;
+Foc/laH:laH    Qualification?  ;

LEXICON Qualification
+Foc/chu’:chu’  Aspect? ;
+Foc/bej:bej    Aspect? ;
+Foc/law’:law’  Aspect? ;

LEXICON Aspect
+Perf:pu’   Honorific?  ;
+Perf:ta’   Honorific?  ;
+Cont:taH   Honorific?  ;
+Prog:lI’   Honorific?  ;

LEXICON Honorific
+Honor:neS  Others? ;

LEXICON Others
+Foc/DI’:DI’    #   ;
+Foc/chugh:chugh    #   ;
+Foc/pa’:pa’    #   ;
+Foc/vIS:vIS    #   ;
+Foc/bogh:bogh  #   ;
+Foc/meh:meH    #   ;
+Foc/Qst:’a’    #   ;
+V→N+Der/wI’:wI’    Augmentation?   ;

! Shorthands

LEXICON Reflexive?
+V:0   Reflexive   ;
+V:0    Volition?   ;

LEXICON Volition?
0   Volition    ;
0   Change? ;

LEXICON Change?
0   Change  ;
0   Cause?  ;

LEXICON Cause?
0   Cause   ;
0   Definite?   ;

LEXICON Definite?
0   Definite    ;
0   Qualification?   ;

LEXICON Qualification?
0   Qualification   ;
0   Aspect? ;

LEXICON Aspect?
0   Aspect  ;
0   Honorific?  ;

LEXICON Honorific?
0   Honorific   ;
0   Others?  ;

LEXICON Others?
0   Others  ;
0   #   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
